Missouri, session 2026, SB1477.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 301.472 and 307.128, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 301.472 and 307.128, to read as follows:
301.472. 1. Any motor vehicle owner may receive
special license plates for any motor vehicle the person
owns, either solely or jointly, other than an apportioned
motor vehicle or a commercial motor vehicle licensed in
excess of twenty-four thousand pounds gross weight as
prescribed in this section after an annual payment of an
emblem-use authorization fee to a professional sports team
which has made an agreement pursuant to subsection 5 of this
section. For the purposes of this section a "professional
sports team" shall mean an organization located in this
state franchised by the National Professional Soccer League,
the National Women's Soccer League, the National Football
League, the National Basketball Association, the Women's
National Basketball Association, the National Hockey League,
the International Hockey League, or the American League or
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1477 2
the National League of Major League Baseball or a team
playing in Major League Soccer.
2. The professional sports team which has made an
agreement pursuant to subsection 5 of this section and which
receives the emblem-use authorization fee hereby authorizes
the use of its official emblem to be affixed on multiyear
personalized license plates as provided in this section.
Any vehicle owner may annually apply for the use of the
emblem. The director of revenue shall not authorize the
manufacturer of the material to produce such license plates
with the individual seal, logo, or emblem until the
department of revenue receives a minimum of one hundred
applications for each specific professional sports team.
3. Upon annual application and payment of a thirty-
five dollar emblem-use contribution to the professional
sports team such team shall issue to the vehicle owner,
without further charge, an emblem-use authorization
statement, which shall be presented by the owner to the
director of the department of revenue at the time of
registration of a motor vehicle. Upon presentation of the
annual statement and payment of a fifteen dollar fee in
addition to the regular registration fees, and presentation
of other documents which may be required by law, the
director shall issue a personalized license plate, which
shall bear the official emblem of the professional sports
team in a manner determined by the director. Such license
plates shall be made with fully reflective material with a
common color scheme and design, shall be clearly visible at
night, and shall be aesthetically attractive, as prescribed
by section 301.130. A fee for the issuance of personalized
license plates issued pursuant to section 301.144 shall not
be required for plates issued pursuant to this section.

SB 1477 3
4. A vehicle owner, who was previously issued a plate
with a professional sports team emblem authorized by this
section but who does not provide an emblem-use authorization
statement at a subsequent time of registration, shall be
issued a new plate which does not bear the professional
sports team emblem, as otherwise provided by law.
5. The director of the department of revenue is
authorized to make agreements with professional sports teams
on behalf of the state which allow the use of any such
team's official emblem pursuant to the provisions of this
section as consideration for receiving a thirty-five dollar
emblem-use contribution.
6. Except as provided in subsection 7 of this section,
a professional sports team receiving a thirty-five dollar
contribution shall forward such contribution, less an amount
not in excess of five percent of the contribution for the
costs of administration, to the Jackson County Sports
Authority or the St. Louis Regional Convention and Visitors
Commission. The moneys shall be administered as follows:
(1) The sports authority may retain not in excess of
five percent of all funds forwarded to it pursuant to this
section for the costs of administration and shall expend the
remaining balance of such funds, after consultation with a
professional sports team within the authority's area, on
marketing and promoting such team. The amount of money
expended from the funds obtained pursuant to this section by
the authority per professional sports team shall be in the
same proportion to the total funds available to be expended
on such team as the proportion of contributions forwarded by
the team to the authority is to the total contributions
received by the authority;

SB 1477 4
(2) The regional convention and visitors commission
shall hold the revenues received from the professional
sports teams in the St. Louis area in separate accounts for
each team. Each team may submit an annual marketing plan to
the commission. Expenses of a team which are in accordance
with the marketing plan shall be reimbursed by the
commission as long as moneys are available in the account.
The commission may retain not in excess of five percent for
the costs of administration. If no marketing plan is
submitted by a team, the commission shall market and promote
the team.
7. (1) The Kansas City Chiefs shall forward all
emblem-use fees received, less an amount not in excess of
five percent of the costs of administration, to the Chiefs'
Children's Fund, a not-for-profit fund established to
benefit children in need in the Kansas City area.
(2) The Kansas City Current shall forward all emblem-
use fees received, less an amount not in excess of five
percent of the costs of administration, to the Kansas City
Current Foundation or a team designated not-for-profit that
benefits youth in the Kansas City area.
100 8. The director of the department of revenue shall
101 promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of
102 this section. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated
103 pursuant to the authority of this section shall become
104 effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the
105 provisions of chapter 536.
307.128. 1. A headlamp on a motorcycle may be wired
to modulate either the upper beam or the lower beam from its
maximum intensity to a lesser intensity provided that:
(1) The rate of modulation shall be two hundred forty
plus or minus forty cycles per minute;

SB 1477 5
(2) The headlamp shall be operated at a maximum power
for fifty to seventy percent of each cycle;
(3) The lowest intensity at any test point shall not
be less than seventeen percent of the maximum intensity
measured at the same point;
(4) The modulator switch shall be wired in the power
lead of the beam filament being modulated and not in the
ground side of the circuit;
(5) Means shall be provided so that both the lower
beam and the upper beam remain operable in the event of a
modulation failure;
(6) The system shall include a sensor mounted with the
axis of its sensing element perpendicular to a horizontal
plane. Headlamp modulation shall cease whenever the level
of light emitted by a tungsten filament operating at three
thousand degrees kelvin is either less than two hundred
seventy lux of direct light for upward pointing sensors or
less than sixty lux of reflected light for downward pointing
sensors. The light is measured by a silicon cell type light
meter that is located at the sensor and pointing in the same
direction as the sensor. A photo gray card is placed at
ground level to simulate the road surface in testing
downward pointing sensors;
(7) Means shall be provided so that both the lower and
upper beam function at design voltage when the headlamp
control switch is in either the lower or upper beam position
when the modulator is off.
2. Each motorcycle headlamp modulator not intended as
original equipment, or its container, shall be labeled with
the maximum wattage, and the minimum wattage appropriate for
its use. Additionally, each such modulator shall comply
with the provisions of subdivisions (1) to (7) of subsection

SB 1477 6
1 of this section when connected to a headlamp of the
maximum-rated power and headlamp of the minimum-rated power,
and shall provide means so that the modulated beam functions
at design voltage when the modulator is off. Instructions,
with a diagram, shall be provided for mounting the light
sensor including location on the motorcycle, distance above
the road surface, and orientation with respect to the light.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subject
to the requirements of subsection 4 of this section, a
motorcycle may be equipped with, and an operator of a
motorcycle may use, the following auxiliary lighting:
(1) [Amber and white] Any color illumination;
(2) Standard bulb running lights; or
(3) Light-emitting diode pods and strips.
4. Lighting under subsection 3 of this section shall
be:
(1) Nonblinking;
(2) Nonflashing;
(3) Nonoscillating; and
(4) Directed toward the engine and the drive train of
the motorcycle to prevent interference with the driver's
operation of the vehicle.
✓